Hawaii statutes.
§801-3 Jury list, witnesses. Any
person indicted for a crime punishable with imprisonment for life not subject
to parole shall, on demand upon the clerk by the person or the person's
counsel, have a list of the jurors returned delivered to the person, and shall
also have process to summon such witnesses as are necessary for the person's
defense. [L 1876, c 40, §42; RL 1925, §4022; RL 1935, §5356; RL 1945, §10687;
RL 1955, §253-7; am L 1957, c 282, §6; HRS §705-7; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1;
gen ch 1993]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next